Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 32 Improvements by Special Assessment
7-32-129. Delivery of assessments to tax collector — Indexing of information.

After the legislative body has levied the assessments against certain parcels of property, the city clerk or person designated shall deliver the assessments to the tax collector of the municipality, who shall enter the assessments into the tax collector's records, which shall include the following information:

Name of owner of the property;

The amount that has been assessed against the parcel of property; and

Any other information deemed appropriate.

The information in subsection (a) shall be indexed according to the names of the owners of the property.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 8; Shan., § 1991a34; Code 1932, § 3441; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1129; Acts 2001, ch. 267, § 5; 2007, ch. 493, § 7; 2009, ch. 489, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 489, § 9 provided that the act, which amended §§7-32-101,7-32-115,7-32-129,7-32-133,7-32-138 and7-33-121, shall apply to all agreements and assessments entered into or imposed pursuant to7-32-101(d) and7-32-115(b) on or after July 1, 2007.

7-32-130. Entries in assessment book — Copies.

The special assessment book referred to in §7-32-129 shall be a book of original entries for any and all purposes, and certified copies of the entries shall be competent evidence in all cases in all the courts.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 16; Shan., § 1991a64; Code 1932, § 3471; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1130.

7-32-131. Lien of assessment — Tax sale.

All such assessments shall constitute a lien on the respective lots or parcels of land upon which they are levied, superior to all other liens except those of the state, county and city for taxes.

The enforcement by the state, county, and city of their liens for taxes on any lot or parcel of land upon which has been levied an assessment for any improvement authorized by this chapter shall not operate to discharge or in any manner affect the city's or town's lien for such assessment; however, a purchaser at a tax sale by the state, county, or city of any lot or parcel of land upon which the assessment has been levied shall take the same subject to the lien of such assessment, and if bought by the state, any conveyance of the title thus acquired or any redemption shall be subject to the lien of such assessment.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 6; Shan., § 1991a26; Code 1932, § 3433; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1131.

7-32-132. Warrant for and payment of assessments.

The tax collector shall issue the tax collector's receivable warrant to the individual or owner desiring to pay any of the assessments, which amount shall be paid to the treasurer of the city as other taxes and revenues of the city are now paid.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 8; Shan., § 1991a35; Code 1932, § 3442; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1132.

7-32-133. Date assessments due — Installment payments.

All assessments levied by virtue of this chapter shall be due and payable within thirty (30) days after the assessment is made final pursuant to § 7-32-125; but at the election of the property owner, to be expressed by notice as provided in § 7-32-134, the assessment may be paid in five (5) annual installments, and shall bear interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum, interest payable semiannually.

For an assessment levied pursuant to § 7-32-115(b), the municipality may permit payment of the assessment in installments, made not more frequently than monthly and amortized for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years from the date of acquisition and accruing interest at a rate to be determined by the municipality; however, the interest rate shall not exceed the maximum rate of interest permitted by law. Property owners at the time of the initial assessment shall enter into a written agreement detailing the terms of the installment payments pursuant to § 7-32-134.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 7; Shan., § 1991a29; Acts 1921 Private, ch. 526, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3436; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1133; Acts 2007, ch. 493, § 8; 2009, ch. 489, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 489, § 9 provided that the act, which amended §§7-32-101,7-32-115,7-32-129,7-32-133,7-32-138 and7-33-121, shall apply to all agreements and assessments entered into or imposed pursuant to §7-32-101(d) and §7-32-115(b) on or after July 1, 2007.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Special Assessments, § 9.

7-32-134. Contract for installment payments.

A property owner desiring to exercise the privilege of payment by installments shall, before the expiration of the thirty (30) days provided for in § 7-32-133, enter into an agreement in writing with the municipality that, in consideration of such privilege, the property owner will make no objection to any illegality or irregularity with regard to the assessment against such property owner's property, and will pay the assessment, as required by law, with the specified interest. Where an assessment is levied against a parcel of property that is subject to or becomes subject to a horizontal property regime, a condominium regime, a time-share regime or a vacation club regime, the officers of the organization representing the owners of interests in such parcel of property or managing such property on behalf of the owners of interests in such parcel of property may enter into such agreement to pay the assessment by installments and such agreement shall be binding upon all owners of interests in property represented in such organization or managed by such organization.

The agreement shall be filed in the office of the city clerk or person designated by the municipality.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 7; Shan., § 1991a30; Code 1932, § 3437; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1134; Acts 2010, ch. 958, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Special Assessments, § 9.

7-32-135. Payment date without installment contract.

In all cases where an agreement pursuant to §7-32-134 has not been signed and filed within the time limit, the entire assessment shall be payable in cash, without interest, before the expiration of thirty (30) days.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 7; Shan., § 1991a31; Code 1932, § 3438; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1135.

7-32-136. Prepayment of installments.

Any property owner who elects to pay the property owner's assessments in five (5) annual installments pursuant to § 7-32-134 shall have the right and privilege of paying the assessment in full at any installment period by paying the full amount of the installments, together with all accrued interest, and an additional sum equal to one half (½) the annual interest on the installments.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), an owner of property subject to an assessment may irrevocably waive the owner's right to prepay the assessment in the contract for installment payments described in § 7-32-134 or by otherwise evidencing waiver in writing.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 7; Shan., § 1991a32; Code 1932, § 3439; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1136; Acts 2007, ch. 493, § 9.

7-32-137. Default in installment payments.

If any property owner defaults in the payment of any installment and interest on the installments, all of the installments, with interest, and an additional sum equal to one half (½) the annual interest, shall become immediately due and payable.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 7; Shan., § 1991a33; Code 1932, § 3440; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1137.

7-32-138. Attachment on delinquency in payments — Sale of land.

Whenever any installments of any assessments become past due for a period of sixty (60) days, it is the duty of the tax collector of the city to certify the installment and all other installments of the same assessment to the city attorney, whose duty it shall be to immediately enforce the collection of the installment or installments, by attachment levied upon the lot or parcel of ground upon which such assessment was levied. In case of any such delinquency, attachment shall be sued out and the lien under the attachment enforced in the chancery court of the county where the land is located. Alternatively, the municipality may collect any installments of any assessments that are past due in the same manner that the municipality is authorized to collect property taxes of the municipality.

Any land so attached may be sold in the attachment proceedings in bar of the equity of redemption and all other rights, legal or equitable, belonging to the owners of the land.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 8; Shan., § 1991a36; Code 1932, § 3443; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1138; Acts 2009, ch. 489, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 489, § 9 provided that the act, which amended §§7-32-101,7-32-115,7-32-129,7-32-133,7-32-138 and7-33-121, shall apply to all agreements and assessments entered into or imposed pursuant to7-32-101(d) and7-32-115(b) on or after July 1, 2007.

7-32-139. Purchase by city — Resale by city.

Whenever such proceedings taken by any such city or town result in the sale of any lot of ground to pay any installment or installments of such levies or assessments, the mayor of such city or town shall have the right to bid at such sale up to the amount of all of the assessments that are outstanding against the property. If the property is struck off to the mayor, the title of the property shall be taken in the name of the municipality. The mayor shall thereafter have the power to execute a quitclaim deed of such city to any individual who tenders in consideration of the quitclaim deed the amount of such special assessments that may have been levied against such property, together with all costs, interest, or charges that may have been incurred in the effort to collect such assessments.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 18; Shan., § 1991a66; Code 1932, § 3473; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1139.

7-32-140. Power to borrow and pay for improvements.

The municipalities affected by this chapter shall have the authority and power to borrow money for the purpose of making payments for the improvements contemplated in this chapter in anticipation of realization of funds, either by the sale of bonds or special assessments. Such municipalities are further authorized to make payments out of any funds on hand or such funds as may be available for either that portion of the work to be assessed against the abutting property owners or owners of property in a flood plain or to be paid by the municipality itself. Nothing in this chapter or chapter 33 of this title shall be construed to prohibit the municipalities affected hereby from making payment of the entire cost of such improvements out of any funds that may be provided or available for such purposes.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 23; Shan., § 1991a84; Code 1932, § 3491; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1140; Acts 2001, ch. 267, § 6.

7-32-141. Supplemental to other law.

This chapter and chapter 33 of this title shall not repeal, modify, or interfere with the operation of any special or local assessment or abutting property law enacted for the benefit of any particular city or cities; provided, that such chapters shall be additional and supplemental to the powers conferred by such local or special law, and any municipality may take advantage of any of the rights, powers, and authority conferred by such chapters, in addition to those which such cities now possess.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 25; Shan., § 1991a86; mod. Code 1932, § 3493; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1141.

7-32-142. Construction of chapter.

This chapter, being necessary to secure and preserve public health, safety, convenience and welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Acts 2007, ch. 493, § 10.